Georgia, session 2025_26, HB133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Student Character Development Act."
H. B. 133 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 49 2330S
SECTION 2.
Subpart 2 of Part 1 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia
Annotated, relating to compulsory attendance, is amended by adding a new Code section to
read as follows:
"20-2-692.4.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Local education agency' shall have the same meaning as in Code Section 20-2-167.1.
(2) 'Released time course' means a course in religious moral instruction provided by a
person or organization independently of a public school.
(b) Each local education agency may adopt a policy that permits all students to be excused
from school to attend a released time course for at least one hour per school week. Such
policy shall require that:
(1) The student's parent or legal guardian gives written consent for the student to attend
the released time course;
(2) The person or organization sponsoring the released time course maintains attendance
records and makes such records available to the officials of the school in which the
student is enrolled;
(3)(A) Transportation to and from the location of the released time course, including
transportation for students with disabilities, is the responsibility of the student or his or
her parent or legal guardian; and
(B) If the person or organization sponsoring the released time course is to provide
student transportation from school, appropriate consent shall be provided by the
student's parent or legal guardian;
(4) The person or organization sponsoring the released time course verifies to the local
education agency that such person or organization assumes full responsibility for the
student at all times such student is participating in a released time course activity,
H. B. 133 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 49 2330S
including, but not limited to, transportation provided by such person or organization to
and from such activity;
(5) Except as necessary to award academic credit for the completion of a released time
course, as provided for in subsection (d) of this Code section, no local education agency
funds except de minimis administrative costs are expended in providing or
accommodating the released time course;
(6) Released time courses are not to be held on public school property unless permitted
under a neutral policy of equal access opening such school property for use by
community groups; and
(7) The student assumes responsibility for any missed school work.
(c) The policy adopted by a local education agency under subsection (b) of this Code
section shall include a requirement for a criminal records check of individuals providing
a released time course to students pursuant to this Code section.
(d) Each local education agency may adopt a policy that awards academic credit for the
completion of a released time course. In determining the academic credit to award for
completion of such course, the local education agency shall evaluate the course based on
purely secular criteria that are substantially the same criteria used to evaluate similar
courses for purposes of determining the academic credit to award for such courses. The
decision to award academic credit for a released time course shall be neutral to, and shall
not involve any test for, religious content or denominational affiliation. Such secular
criteria may include the following:
(1) The number of hours of classroom instruction time;
(2) A review of the released time course syllabus that reflects released time course
requirements and materials used;
(3) The methods of assessment used in the released time course; and
(4) The qualifications of the released time course instructor.
H. B. 133 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 49 2330S
(e) No local education agency or official or employee thereof shall be liable in any civil
action for injury allegedly arising from a student's transit to or from a released time course
when private transportation is used under a released time course policy adopted under
subsection (b) of this Code section.
(f) While in attendance in a released time course, a student shall not be considered absent
from school.
(g)(1) The Department of Education is authorized and directed to take all steps
reasonably necessary to maximize the amounts of state and federal funding local
education agencies receive regardless of the number of students who participate in a
released time course.
(2) The Department of Education shall promulgate model policies and procedures
consistent with this Code section to be available for use by local education agencies."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 133 (SUB)
- 4 -